Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-154.5] Association
documents to be provided. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in the
declaration, bylaws, or house rules, if any, the following documents, records,
and information, whether maintained, kept, or required to be provided pursuant
to this section or section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, shall be made
available to any unit owner and the owner's authorized agents by the managing
agent, resident manager, board through a board member, or the association's
representative:

(1) All financial and other records sufficiently
detailed in order to comply with requests for information and disclosures
related to the resale of units;

(2) An accurate copy of the declaration, bylaws,
house rules, if any, master lease, if any, a sample original conveyance
document, and all public reports and any amendments thereto;

(3) Detailed, accurate records in chronological order
of the receipts and expenditures affecting the common elements, specifying and
itemizing the maintenance and repair expenses of the common elements and any
other expenses incurred and monthly statements indicating the total current
delinquent dollar amount of any unpaid assessments for common expenses;

(4) All records and the vouchers authorizing the
payments and statements kept and maintained at the address of the project, or
elsewhere within the State as determined by the board, subject to section
514B-152;

(5) All signed and executed agreements for managing
the operation of the property, expressing the agreement of all parties,
including but not limited to financial and accounting obligations, services
provided, and any compensation arrangements, including any subsequent
amendments;

(6) An accurate and current list of members of the
condominium association and the members' current addresses and the names and
addresses of the vendees under an agreement of sale, if any. A copy of the
list shall be available, at cost, to any unit owner or owner's authorized agent
who furnishes to the managing agent, resident manager, or the board a duly
executed and acknowledged affidavit stating that the list:

(A) Shall be used by the unit owner or
owner's authorized agent personally and only for the purpose of soliciting
votes or proxies or for providing information to other unit owners with respect
to association matters; and

(B) Shall not be used by the unit owner or
owner's authorized agent or furnished to anyone else for any other purpose;

(7) The association's most current financial
statement, at no cost or on twenty-four-hour loan, at a convenient location
designated by the board;

(8) Meeting minutes of the association, pursuant to
section 514B-122;

(9) Meeting minutes of the board, pursuant to section
514B-126, which shall be:

(A) Available for examination by unit owners
or owners' authorized agents at no cost or on twenty-four-hour loan at a
convenient location at the project, to be determined by the board; or

(B) Transmitted to any unit owner or owner's
authorized agent making a request for the minutes within fifteen days of receipt
of the request by the owner or owner's authorized agent; provided that:

(i) The minutes shall be transmitted by mail,
electronic mail transmission, or facsimile, by the means indicated by the owner
or owner's authorized agent, if the owner or owner's authorized agent indicated
a preference at the time of the request; and

(ii) The owner or owner's authorized agent
shall pay a reasonable fee for administrative costs associated with handling
the request, subject to section 514B-105(d);

(10) Financial statements, general ledgers, the
accounts receivable ledger, accounts payable ledgers, check ledgers, insurance
policies, contracts, and invoices of the association for the duration those
records are kept by the association, and any documents regarding delinquencies
of ninety days or more shall be available for examination by unit owners or
owners' authorized agents at convenient hours at a place designated by the
board; provided that:

(A) The board may require unit owners or
owners' authorized agents to furnish to the association a duly executed and
acknowledged affidavit stating that the information is requested in good faith
for the protection of the interests of the association, its members, or both;
and

(B) Unit owners or owners' authorized agents
shall pay for administrative costs in excess of eight hours per year;

(11) Proxies, tally sheets, ballots, unit owners'
check-in lists, and the certificate of election subject to section 514B-154(c);

(12) Copies of an association's documents, records,
and information, whether maintained, kept, or required to be provided pursuant
to this section or section 514B‑152, 514B-153, or 514B-154;

(13) A copy of the management contract from the entity
that manages the operation of the property before the organization of an
association; and

(14) Other documents requested by a unit owner or
owner's authorized agent in writing; provided that the board shall give written
authorization or written refusal with an explanation of the refusal within
thirty calendar days of receipt of a request for documents pursuant to this
paragraph.

(b) Subject to section 514B-105(d), copies of
the items in subsection (a) shall be provided to any unit owner or owner's
authorized agent upon the owner's or owner's authorized agent's request;
provided that the owner or owner's authorized agent pays a reasonable fee for
duplication, postage, stationery, and other administrative costs associated
with handling the request.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision in the
declaration, bylaws, or house rules providing for another period of time, all
documents, records, and information listed under subsection (a), whether
maintained, kept, or required to be provided pursuant to this section or
section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, shall be provided no later than thirty
days after receipt of a unit owner's or owner's authorized agent's written
request, unless a lesser time is provided pursuant to this section or section
514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B‑154, and except as provided in subsection
(a)(14).

(d) Any documents, records, and information,
whether maintained, kept, or required to be provided pursuant to this section
or section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, may be made available
electronically to the unit owner or owner's authorized agent if the owner or
owner's authorized agent requests such in writing.

(e) An association may comply with this
section or section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154 by making the required
documents, records, and information available to unit owners or owners' authorized
agents for download through an internet site, at the option of each unit owner
or owner's authorized agent and at no cost to the unit owner or owner's
authorized agent.

(f) Any fee charged to a unit owner or owner's
authorized agent to obtain copies of the association's documents, records, and
information, whether maintained, kept, or required to be provided pursuant to
this section or section 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, shall be reasonable;
provided that a reasonable fee shall include administrative and duplicating
costs and shall not exceed $1 per page, or portion thereof, except that the fee
for pages exceeding eight and one-half inches by fourteen inches may exceed $1
per page.

(g) This section shall apply to condominiums
organized under chapter 514A or 514B.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to create any new requirements for the release of documents, records, or
information. [L 2014, c 188, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next